test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-paeaeva_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pǟva: # Noun 24 'eng /est päev/fin' - full paradigm
     pǟva+N+Sg+Nom: pǟva
     pǟva+N+Sg+Gen: pǟva
     pǟva+N+Sg+Par: päuvõ
     pǟva+N+Sg+Dat: pǟvan
     pǟva+N+Sg+Ins: pǟvaks
     pǟva+N+Sg+Ill: päuvõ
     pǟva+N+Sg+Ela: pǟvast
     pǟva+N+Pl+Nom: pǟvad
     pǟva+N+Pl+Gen: pǟvad
     pǟva+N+Pl+Par: päuvḑi
     pǟva+N+Pl+Dat: pǟvadõn
     pǟva+N+Pl+Ins: pǟvadõks
     pǟva+N+Pl+Ill: päuvži
     pǟva+N+Pl+Ela: päuvšti
